src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the Sakirabiá language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
etu+N:etu  Cases "basket" ;
met+N:me%{tr%} Cases "husband" ;
opo+N:opo Cases "hand" ;
pisa+N:pisa    Cases  "liver" ;
tak+N:ta%{kg%} Cases "daughter" ;
tek+N:te%{kg%}    Cases  "house" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
